Louisiana, session 2026, SB250.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:802(B)(9) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 42:851(W),
855, and 855.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§802. Powers and duties; Office of Group Benefits
* * *
B. In addition, the office shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
(9) To administer or provide for the administration of an Internal Revenue
Service qualified cafeteria plan, including any weight management plan, if
applicable. The plan shall be developed, negotiated, and implemented by the office
subject to approval of the appropriate standing committees of the legislature having
jurisdiction over review of agency rules of the Office of Group Benefits as
designated by R.S. 49:966(B)(21)(c) or the subcommittee on oversight of such
standing committees. The provisions of Chapter 17 of Subtitle III of Title 39 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 shall not apply.
* * *
§851. Authority for employee benefit programs; payroll deduction for payment of
premiums
* * *
W. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any enrollee
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 250 ENROLLED
or dependent enrolled in a comprehensive weight management plan offered by
the Office of Group Benefits shall pay one hundred percent of the premium for
the weight management plan.
* * *
§855. Office of Group Benefits; comprehensive weight management services
A. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Office of Group Benefits shall offer
enrollment in a comprehensive weight management plan to plan participants
for enrollees and dependents. Any such plan shall include the following
comprehensive weight management and metabolic health services:
(1) FDA-approved medications.
(2) Metabolic health therapies compounded in compliance with 21 U.S.C.
353a.
(3) Medical evaluations.
(4) Prescribing oversight.
(5) Follow-up care.
(6) Related support services.
(7) Longitudinal metabolic health outcome measurements.
B. Enrollment shall be voluntary and shall not be a condition of
enrollment in any health benefit plan.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require any health
benefit plan administered by the Office of Group Benefits to alter existing
medical necessity standards, utilization management protocols, or formulary
requirements.
§855.1. Weight loss medications; notification to enrollees
A. No later than October 1, 2026, the Office of Group Benefits shall
notify all enrollees of available options for direct purchasing of FDA-approved
medications through pharmaceutical manufacturers.
B. The Office of Group Benefits shall provide the notification by posting
information on its website and by electronic distribution.
C. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any enrollee or
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 250 ENROLLED
dependent in the Office of Group Benefits plans who purchases a weight loss
pharmaceutical product directly through a pharmaceutical manufacturer shall
pay one hundred percent of the cost of the medications.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.